Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1463
Rules and regulations.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Law Enforcement Attraction and Retention Act.

Laws 2022, LB1241, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 200.
April 8, 2026June 30, 2028